District of Columbia statutes.
7-2508.03

Registration period.

A gun offender shall comply with the registration and verification provisions required by § 7-2508.02 for a period beginning when he or she is sentenced for a gun offense and continuing until 2 years after the expiration of any time being served on probation, parole, supervised release, or conditional release, or 2 years after the gun offender is unconditionally released from a correctional facility, prison, hospital, or other place of confinement, whichever is latest. The registration period is tolled for any time the gun offender fails to register or otherwise fails to comply with the requirements of this subchapter.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VIII, § 803
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 205, 56 DCR 7413

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2508.02.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 205 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).